Maine, session 132, LD1132.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 33 MRSA §1451, sub-§1, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. "Limited common element" has the same meaning as in section 1601-103,
subsection (16).
Sec. 2. 33 MRSA §1451, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 376, §1, is amended to
read:
2. Prohibition. A restriction may not prohibit or put an unreasonable limitation on
low-impact landscaping on any portion of a condominium or real estate subject to common
ownership that is not subject to common ownership and that the owner has the right to
exclusive use of, including limited common elements, as long as the owner maintains and
regularly tends to the low-impact landscaping. Pesticides may not be applied to limited
common elements or land within 50 feet of a unit without the express permission of the
unit owner.